California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) The rating organization designated the statistical agent pursuant to Section 11751.5 shall provide to the Director of Industrial Relations, upon request, any information in the possession of, or reasonably attainable by the rating organization, that would assist the Director of Industrial Relations to identify employers who fail to secure adequate insurance in violation of Section 3700 of the Labor Code. The information requested pursuant to this section shall be provided by the rating organization in a form and manner prescribed by the Director of Industrial Relations.

(b) The rating organization designated the statistical agent pursuant to Section 11751.5 shall provide to the Registrar of Contractors of the Contractor’s State License Board, upon request, any information in the possession of, or reasonably attainable by, the rating organization that would assist in identifying licensed contractors who fail to secure adequate insurance in violation of Section 3700 of the Labor Code. The information requested pursuant to this section shall be provided by the rating organization in a form and manner prescribed by the Registrar of Contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.8.

An insurer shall report to its rating organization as corrections or revisions of losses, pursuant to the unit statistical plan and uniform experience rating plans approved by the commissioner, if any of the following is applicable:

(a) A loss record detail was incorrectly reported through mistake other than error of judgment.

(b) One or more claims are declared noncompensable. A claim is declared noncompensable if any of the following applies:

(1) There is an official ruling specifically holding that a claimant is not entitled to benefits under the workers’ compensation laws of the state, even though the claimant may have been awarded reimbursement for expenses incurred by the claimant in presenting the case.

(2) No claim was filed during the period of limitation provided by the workers’ compensation laws for the filing of the claim, and the carrier, therefore, closes the claim.

(3) Where the carrier contends, prior to the valuation date, that a claimant is not entitled to benefits under the workers’ compensation laws and the claim is officially closed because of the claimant’s failure to prosecute the claim.

(c) The carrier has recovered in an action against a third party.

(d) A death claim has been compromised over the sole issue of the applicability of the workers’ compensation laws of the state.

(e) The exposure has been reassigned to another classification through the revision of an audit, in which case the insurer shall file with the revision of exposure a revision of losses that will reassign all claims to the appropriate classification.

(f) A clerical error in either the classification assignment or the type of injury assignment of a given claim, or a group of claims, has been discovered by the insurer.

(g) A clerical error in either the classification assignment or the type of injury assignment of a given claim has been discovered by the rating organization. The insurer shall, when notified by the rating organization, file a revision of losses or make satisfactory explanation.

(h) A correction is made in a classification assignment of a given claim, or a group of claims, as a result of the organization test audit of an insured for which the experience has been submitted.

(i) The claim has been determined to be a joint coverage claim in accordance with the unit statistical plan approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 748, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.82.

(a) An insurer under a wrap-up insurance policy shall report workers’ compensation losses and payroll information for each contractor and subcontractor to its rating organization on a timely basis and in accordance with the uniform statistical plan. Within 10 days, upon request, the insurer shall provide to each contractor and subcontractor copies of the report covering workers’ compensation losses and payroll information for that contractor or subcontractor.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “wrap-up insurance policy” is an insurance policy, or series of policies, written to cover risks associated with a work of improvement, as defined in Section 8050 of the Civil Code, and
 covering two or more of the contractors or subcontractors that work on that work of improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 41.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

11751.9.

Whenever a claim or claims used in an experience rating are closed and reported pursuant to the unit statistical plan approved by the commissioner and are valued, in the aggregate, at an amount that is less than 60 percent of the highest reported aggregate value of all of these claims, then the experience rating shall be revised pursuant to the uniform experience rating plan approved by the commissioner based on the most current reported values for all claims used in the experience rating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 748, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.

The commissioner may, as often as reasonable and necessary, make or cause to be made an examination of each rating or advisory organization to ascertain whether such organizations comply with the legal requirements applicable to it under this article.

In lieu of any such examination the commissioner may accept the report of an examination made by the insurance supervisory official of another state or the report of a representative designated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.1.

The officers, managers, agents and employees of any such organization may be examined by the commissioner at any time under oath and shall exhibit all books, records, accounts, documents or agreements governing its method of operation together with all data, statistics and information of every kind and character collected or considered by such organization in the conduct of the operations to which the examination relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.2.

The reasonable cost of any examination authorized by this article of any rating or advisory organization shall be paid by the organization examined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a licensed rating organization shall make available any policy information contained in its records to the following:

(1) The Department of Industrial Relations.

(2) Any other governmental agency if the Insurance Commissioner, after consultation with the licensed rating organization, approves the release of the policy information requested to the agency.

(b) The Department of Industrial Relations and any other governmental agency shall specify to the licensed rating organization, in writing, the information requested, that the information requested is to be used to facilitate the agency’s performance of its constitutional or statutory duties, and that the information received will not be released to others, except in the discharge of a specific statutory or constitutional duty, or published without the prior written consent of the licensed rating organization. In addition, if the Insurance Commissioner’s approval is required for the release of the policy information requested, a written copy of the approval shall be submitted to the licensed rating organization.

(c) As used in this section, “policy information” means information which is contained in a workers’ compensation policy, including, but not limited to, the identity and address of the employer, the identity of the insurer, the policy number, and the policy period.

(d) Information obtained by a governmental agency pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any other law of this state.

(e) No licensed rating organization or member thereof, or member of a committee of a licensed rating organization when acting in its capacity as a member of the committee, or officer or employee of a licensed rating organization, when acting within the scope of his or her employment, shall be liable to any person for injury, personal or otherwise, or damages caused or alleged to have been caused, either directly or indirectly, by the disclosure of information to a governmental agency pursuant to this section, or for the accuracy or completeness of the information so disclosed.

(f) This section shall not be construed as implying the existence of liability in circumstances not defined in this section, nor as implying a legislative recognition that, except for enactment of this section, a liability has existed or would exist in the circumstances stated in this section.

(g) This section shall not be construed as limiting any authority of a licensed rating organization to disclose information contained in its records to others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.6.

(a) A licensed rating organization shall make available, in writing, to an employer insured under a workers’ compensation policy, all policyholder information contained in its records upon request of the employer and after notice to the employer’s insurer.

(b) As used in this section, “policyholder information” means all information relating to the employer’s loss experience, claims, classification assignments, and policy contracts. Policyholder information also includes information relating to rating plans, rating systems, manual rules, and any other information that impacts the policyholder’s pure premium rates.

(c) If a licensed rating organization rejects an employer’s request for policyholder information, the rating organization shall notify the employer in writing of the reasons for the rejection. An employer whose request has been rejected in whole or in part may appeal to the commissioner in accordance with Section 11753.1. If the commissioner finds that the reasons for the rejection are not justified, he or she may order the rating organization to furnish that information to the employer.

(d) No licensed rating organization or member of the organization, or member of a committee of a licensed rating organization when acting in its capacity as a member of the committee, or officer or employee of a licensed rating organization, when acting within the scope of his or her employment, is liable to any person for injury, personal or otherwise, or damages caused or alleged to have been caused, either directly or indirectly, by the disclosure of information to an employer under this section or for the accuracy or completeness of the information disclosed.

(e) This section does not imply the existence of liability in circumstances not defined in this section, nor does it imply a legislative recognition that, except for enactment of this section, a liability has existed or would exist in the circumstances stated in this section.

(f) This section does not limit any authority of a licensed rating organization to disclose information contained in its records to others.

(g) There shall be established in all licensed rating organizations a policyholder ombudsman. The policyholder ombudsman shall be a person with sufficient knowledge of the workers’ compensation ratemaking process to provide information and assistance to policyholders in obtaining and evaluating the information provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730) and this article, and in Sections 3761 and 3762 of the Labor Code. Every rating organization licensed in this state shall provide compensation for the ombudsman and necessary staff and other necessary resources to allow the ombudsman to provide prompt and complete service to workers’ compensation policyholders of this state. The policyholder ombudsman may advise the policyholder in any dispute with insurers or the rating organization that the ombudsman serves, or on appeal to the commissioner as provided in Section 11737.

(h) For all policies of insurance issued or renewed on or after January 1, 1994, the insurer shall advise the policyholder in writing of the following:

(1) The policyholder’s right to request a written report containing the information set forth in this section from the licensed rating organization of which the insurer is a member, and the policyholder’s right to contact the policyholder ombudsman to assist in obtaining and evaluating information relating to rates, together with the telephone number and address of the ombudsman, as well as the policyholder’s right to contact the department to resolve a dispute with an insurer, as provided in this section and Section 11737.

(2) If a participating policy, that upon payment or nonpayment of a dividend the policyholder shall be provided a written explanation, in clear and understandable language, setting forth the basis of the calculation and expressing any dividend in both dollar amount and as a percentage of earned premium under the policy.

(3) The date when the insurer is required to file the first unit statistical report with the licensed rating organization designated by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 582, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.7.

(a) A licensed rating organization may make available experience rating information contained in its records to any insurer admitted to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state or to any insurance agent or broker that is licensed to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state, if the insurer, agent, or broker submits a written request to the licensed rating organization stating all of the following:

(1) The requesting insurer is admitted to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state or that the requesting agent or broker is licensed to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state.

(2) The information requested.

(3) The information requested will be used to facilitate the transaction of workers’ compensation insurance by the insurer, agent, or broker.

(4) The information received will not be released by the agent or broker to others, except to facilitate the transaction of workers’ compensation insurance by the requesting agent or broker.

(b) The licensed rating organization may, but shall not be required to, verify that an insurer requesting information under this section is admitted to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state or that an insurance agent or broker requesting information under this section is licensed to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Experience rating information” means information released on microfiche, at an Internet Web site or other electronic format, or in other forms or media by a licensed rating organization that identifies all experience-rated employers, and the experience ratings and classifications or experience modifications that apply or applied to those employers.

(2) “Transaction,” as applied to workers’ compensation insurance, includes any of the following:

(A) Solicitation.

(B) Negotiations preliminary to execution of a contract of insurance.

(C) Execution of a contract of insurance.

(D) Resolution of matters arising out of the contract and subsequent to its execution.

(d) Experience rating information made available pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall not be used for any purpose other than to facilitate the transaction of workers’ compensation insurance by the insurer, agent, or broker receiving the information pursuant to this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including this section, a licensed rating organization may not enter into a contract or other agreement, including its constitution, articles of incorporation, or bylaws that prohibits information services companies in the business of publishing or providing experience rating information immediately prior to September 15, 1989, from continuing on or after September 15, 1989, to receive and provide to others experience rating information from whatever sources and in whatever forms or media.

(f) No licensed rating organization, member of a licensed rating organization, member of a committee of a licensed rating organization when acting in its capacity as a member of the committee, or officer or employee of a licensed rating organization when acting within the scope of his or her employment, shall be liable to any person for injury, personal or otherwise, or damages caused or alleged to have been caused, either directly or indirectly, by the disclosure of information pursuant to this section, or to the members of those organizations, or for the accuracy or completeness of the information disclosed.

(g) This section shall not be construed as implying the existence of liability in circumstances not defined in this section, nor as implying a legislative recognition that, except for the enactment of this section, a liability has existed or would exist in the circumstances stated in this section.

(h) This section shall not be construed as limiting any authority of a licensed rating organization to disclose information contained in its records to others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.75.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed rating organization shall, pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner after notice and hearing, establish and maintain an Internet Web site for the purposes of assisting any person to determine whether an employer is insured for workers’ compensation.

(2) An Internet Web site developed pursuant to this section shall not include any links to a commercial, for-profit Internet Web site, other than a link to the licensed rating organization’s homepage, and shall not contain any advertising other than the
 name, logo, and contact information of the licensed rating organization.

(b) The Internet Web site shall:

(1) Permit a person to submit a query for coverage information concerning a specified employer on a specified date. The specified date shall be within five years of the date of query.

(2) Permit the query to specify an employer, using the name, address, or other identifying information of the employer, or combinations of identifying information, as may be provided by regulations adopted by the commissioner. Other identifying information may include, but need not be limited to, the employer’s federal employer identification number.

(3) In response to the query, provide the name of the workers’ compensation insurer or insurers
 for the employer on the date specified in the query according to the most recent information available to the rating organization, subject to paragraph (7), and provide a contact address for the insurer from information available to the rating organization, or by providing a hypertext link to insurer information available on the department’s Internet Web site.

(4) Be accessible for inquiries without charge. However, the commissioner may, at his or her discretion, permit the rating organization to impose access restrictions as necessary to deter the use of the Internet Web site for purposes other than those for which it was intended.

(5) Contain a hypertext link to the Department of Industrial Relations’ Internet Web site for the purpose of locating employers who may be self-insured.

(6) Include any disclaimers that
 the commissioner may prescribe.

(7) Be updated to reflect policy information as soon as is reasonably feasible following submission of that information by insurers to the rating organization, as the commissioner shall require.

(8) Include a disclaimer stating that the search results may not reflect recent changes in information.

(9) Include a disclaimer stating that the failure of an employer to appear in response to a query does not mean that the employer does not have insurance or is operating in violation of California law.

(10) Include the date that the Internet Web site was last updated.

(c) A rating organization shall not be required to disclose on the Internet Web site any policy
 numbers, inception or expiration dates, or confidential information, as defined by the commissioner.

(d) The Internet Web site specified in this section shall become operative no later than one year after the effective date of regulations adopted by the commissioner implementing this section.

(e) The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this section no later than January 1, 2011. These regulations shall specify a method by which an employer may dispute through the rating organization or the employer’s insurance company the accuracy of the information displayed on the Internet Web site.

(f) No rating organization, member of a rating organization, or member of a committee of a rating organization when acting within his or her capacity as a member of the committee, or officer or employee of a rating organization when acting within the
 scope of his or her employment, shall be liable to any person for injury, personal or otherwise, or damages caused, or alleged to have been caused, either directly or indirectly, by the good faith disclosure of information pursuant to this section, or for the accuracy or completeness of any information disclosed in good faith.

(g) This section shall not be construed to create liability except as provided in this section, nor as a legislative recognition that, except for the enactment of this section, a liability would exist.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the authority of a rating organization to disclose information contained in its records to others.

(i) The commissioner shall conduct a review and evaluation of the establishment and operation of the Internet Web site and an assessment of
 whether it is achieving its intended purpose and provide a written report on his or her findings no later than July 1, 2013. The report shall include, to the extent possible, statistics on usage, error rates, user complaints, and efforts undertaken by the commissioner to improve the operation of the Internet Web site. The commissioner shall present a copy of the report to the office of the President pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the Assembly, the Senate Committee on Banking, Finance and Insurance, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Department of Finance, and the Department of Industrial Relations and shall make it available on the Internet Web site of the Department of Insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.8.

(a) For all policies of insurance issued, or renewed for the first time on or after January 1, 1995, the insurer shall provide a notice, approved by the commissioner, to the policyholder, explaining in easily understandable language the workers’ compensation rating laws. For policies issued or renewed between January 1, 1994, and January 1, 1995, inclusive, the insurer shall include a notice to the policyholder, in easily understandable language, containing a summary of the changes in the rating laws enacted during the 1993–94 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(b) The notice required by this section may be combined with the notice required by subdivision (h) of Section 11752.6.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11752.9.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 11750.3, a rating organization shall provide a policyholder with written notification if it imposes a change in the classification assignment of the policyholder. The written notification shall be provided to the policyholder at the same time that it is provided to the insurer. A rating organization may satisfy this requirement by furnishing the policyholder with a copy of the notice that it provides to the insurer regarding the change in classification assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.

No advisory organization shall conduct its operations in this State unless and until it has filed with the commissioner:

a. A copy of its constitution, articles of incorporation, agreement of association, and of its by-laws, rules and regulations governing its activities, all duly certified by the custodian of the originals thereof.

b. A list of its members and subscribers.

c. The name and address of a resident of this State upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process may be served.

Every such advisory organization shall notify the commissioner promptly of every change in its constitution, its articles of incorporation, agreement of association, and of its by-laws, rules and regulations governing the conduct of its business; its list of members and subscribers; and the name and address of the resident of this State designated by it upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting such organizations may be served.

No such advisory organization shall engage in any unfair or unreasonable practice with respect to its activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.1.

(a) Any person aggrieved by any decision, action, or omission to act of a rating organization may request that the rating organization reconsider the decision, action, or omission. If the request for reconsideration is rejected or is not acted upon within 30 days by the rating organization, the person requesting reconsideration may, within a reasonable time, appeal from the decision, action, or omission of the rating organization. The appeal shall be made to the commissioner by filing a written complaint and request for a hearing specifying the grounds relied upon. If the commissioner has information on the subject appealed from and believes that probable cause for the appeal does not exist or that the appeal is not made in good faith, the commissioner may deny the appeal without a hearing. The commissioner shall otherwise hold a hearing to consider and determine the matter presented by the appeal.

(b) Any insurer adopting a change in the classification assignment of an employer that results in an increased premium shall notify the employer in writing, or if the insurance was transacted through an insurance agent or broker, the insurer shall notify the agent or broker who shall notify the employer in writing of the change and the reasons for the change. Any employer receiving this notice shall have the right to request reconsideration and appeal the reclassification pursuant to this section. The notice required by this section shall inform the employer of his or her rights pursuant to this section. No notification shall be required when the change is a result of a regulation adopted by the Department of Insurance or other action by or under the authority of the commissioner.

An insurer shall provide written notification of the revised classification assignment to an employer within 30 days after adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 873, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.2.

(a) If a change in a classification assignment on a workers’ compensation insurance policy is due to an erroneous classification and results in a decreased premium, the classification change shall become effective as of the inception date of a policy in effect on the date the revised classification assignment is published by an insurer or, if the classification is assigned by the designated rating organization, when the insurer and insured are notified in writing by the designated rating organization that the erroneous classification assignment is under review. The revised classification assignment shall be applied as of the inception date of a policy that expired no more than 12 months prior to the date the revised classification assignment was published or the insurer and insured were notified in writing by the designated rating organization that assigned the classification that the erroneous classification assignment was under review, provided that the erroneous classification assignment was applicable to that policy.

(b) If a change in a classification assignment on a workers’ compensation insurance policy is due to an erroneous classification and results in an increased premium, the classification change shall become effective on the effective date of the erroneous classification assignment provided any of the following conditions occur:

(1) The revised classification assignment is published within three months of the effective date or publication date of the erroneous assignment.

(2) The insurer or, where applicable, the designated rating organization, was notified in writing within three months of the effective date or publication date of the erroneous classification assignment of a possible error.

(3) The designated rating organization notified the insurer in writing within three months of the effective date or publication date of the erroneous classification assignment that the erroneous classification assignment was under review.

If one or more of the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) do not occur, the revised classification assignment shall become effective as of the date it is published unless the publication date is less than three months prior to the expiration date of the outstanding policy, in which case the revised classification assignment shall become effective as of the inception date of the policy that replaced the outstanding policy.

(c) If a change in a classification assignment on a workers’ compensation policy is due to an insured’s change of operations, any resulting increase or decrease in premium shall become effective on the date of the change of operations.

(d) Any insurer that violates this section shall be subject to civil penalties in an amount of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 375, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11753.3.

Notwithstanding Section 1851.1, a workers’ compensation insurance rating organization licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article which does not make rates, rating plans or rating systems for insurance covering employers against their liability for compensation or damages under the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 901, et seq.) shall not be required to be licensed as a rating organization or registered as an advisory organization pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Part 2 of Division 1, and shall have authority under its license as a workers’ compensation insurance rating organization issued pursuant to this article to:

(a) Collect and tabulate loss and expense experience statistics and other information and data relating to insurance covering employers against their liability for compensation under the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act.

(b) Furnish or exhange such information and experience data to or with rating organizations, advisory organizations and insurers in this and other states.

(c) Adopt and enforce compliance by its insurer members with reasonable rules and statistical plans to be used in the recording and reporting by insurer members of their California longshoremen and harbor workers’ insurance loss and expense experience in order that such experience of all of its insurer members shall be available in such form and detail as will be of aid to the commissioner in the enforcement of and to its insurer members in complying with the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(d) Engage in the same activities and carry out the same functions with respect to insurance covering the liability of employers for compensation or damages under the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act that it is authorized to engage in or carry out with respect to California workers’ compensation insurance generally under the provisions of this article other than the making of rates, rating plans and rating systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.

If the commissioner has good cause to believe that a rating or advisory organization or an insurer does not comply with the requirements of this article applicable to it, he shall, unless he has good cause to believe that such noncompliance is wilful, give notice in writing to such organization or insurer, stating therein in what manner and to what extent such noncompliance is alleged to exist and specifying therein a reasonable time, not less than 10 days thereafter, in which such noncompliance may be corrected. Notices under this section shall be confidential as between the commissioner and the organization or insurer unless a hearing is held under Section 11754.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.1.

If the commissioner has good cause to believe such noncompliance to be wilful, or if within the period prescribed by the commissioner in the notice required by Section 11754 the organization or insurer does not make such change as may be necessary to correct the noncompliance specified by the commissioner or establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that such noncompliance does not exist, then the commissioner may hold a public hearing in connection therewith, provided that within a reasonable period of time, which shall not be less than 10 days before the date of such hearing, he shall mail written notice specifying the matters to be considered at such hearing to such organization or insurer. Such notice shall conform to the requirements for an accusation as prescribed by Section 11503 of the Government Code. If no notice has been given as provided in Section 11754 such notice shall state therein in what manner and to what extent noncompliance is alleged to exist. The hearing shall not include any additional subjects not specified in the notices required by Section 11754 or this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.2.

If, after a hearing pursuant to Section 11754.1, the commissioner finds:

a. That any rating or advisory organization or other organization authorized by this article or any insurer has violated the provisions of this article applicable to it, he may issue an order to such organization or insurer which has been the subject of the hearing, specifying in what respect such violation exists and stating when, within a reasonable period of time, the violation shall cease. 

b. That any conditions prerequisite to the granting of a license to a rating organization no longer exist, he may issue an order to such organization which has been the subject of the hearing specifying the condition which has ceased to exist and stating when within a reasonable time the condition shall be complied with. If the condition is not complied with within the time specified the commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of such organization, in addition to any other penalty provided in this article.

c. That any rating organization has wilfully engaged in any fraudulent, dishonest act or practice, he may suspend or revoke the license of such organization, in addition to any other penalty provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.3.

In addition to other penalties provided in this code the commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of any rating organization or insurer which fails to comply within the time limited by such order or extension thereof which the commissioner may grant, with an order of the commissioner lawfully made by him pursuant to Section 11754.1 and effective pursuant to Section 11754.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.4.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, all proceedings in connection with the denial, suspension or revocation of a license of a rating organization or insurer under this article shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted to him therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11754.5.

Any finding, determination, rule, ruling, or order made by the commissioner under this article or Article 2 (commencing with Section 11730) shall be subject to review by the courts of the state pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 582, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11755.

No person, insurer, rating or advisory organization shall willfully withhold information from, or knowingly give false or misleading information to, the commissioner or to any rating organization, which will affect the rates, rating systems or premiums for workers’ compensation insurance and employer’s liability insurance incidental thereto and written in connection therewith.

In the event of the refusal by any insured employer to permit an audit or an examination provided for in subdivision (f) of Section 11750.3, the commissioner shall, upon the verified petition of the rating organization concerned, take such action as the commissioner may be authorized to take pursuant to and subject to the provisions of this code and of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 303.)
-------------------------------------------

11756.

(a) Any person, insurer, or organization, who fails to comply with a final order of the commissioner under this article shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding fifty dollars ($50), but if the failure is willful, he, she, or it shall be liable to the state in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the failure. The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring an action in the name of the people of the state of California to enforce collection. These penalties may be in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(b) A willful violation of the provisions of this article by any person is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

11757.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit or regulate the payment of dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders, members or subscribers. A plan for the payment of dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by insurers to their policyholders, members or subscribers shall not be deemed a rating plan or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1123.)
-------------------------------------------

11758.
